Wyoming, session 2025, SF0063.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 11-28-106 by creating a new
subsection (c) is amended to read:
11-28-106. Construction and maintenance of partition
fences; fencing of state lands.
(c) Private landowners whose property adjoins state
lands on which the private landowner does not hold a lease
may construct a lawful partition fence along state lands
and the office of state lands and investments or, if the
state lands are currently leased, the lessee of the state
lands shall pay for one-half (1/2) of the actual cost of
the construction of the lawful partition fence. Private
landowners and the office of state lands and investments,
or the lessee at all times that the state lands are leased,
shall contribute to the cost of maintenance of the lawful
partition fence in proportion to their respective interests
in the fence.
Section 2. The board of land commissioners shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0063
ENROLLED ACT NO. 18, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2